fi_FI.dic
esiintyä/V
esittää/V
jäädä/V
käsitellä/V
käydä/V
käyttää/V
liittyä/V
lähteä/V
mennä/V
merkitä/V
määrätä/V
nähdä/V
näyttää/V
pitää/V
pyrkiä/V
päästä/V
syntyä/V
tehdä/V
tietää/V
vetää/V
